Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1748
Termination of members.

(1) A member may voluntarily terminate his or her membership at any time in the way and manner provided in the bylaws.

(2) Termination of membership shall not serve to relieve a person from any liability to the credit union nor shall it be the basis for accelerating any obligation not in default. A terminated member shall be paid all sums in any of his or her share accounts without maturity dates within thirty calendar days. Sums in any share account with a maturity date shall not be paid prior to maturity unless the member specifically requests the funds. The credit union shall not be required to pay any funds from a share account to the extent that they secure loans and other obligations owing to the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 48.